Massachusetts, session 194th, S2051.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of Part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following new
subparagraph:
(20) An amount equal to the amount by which tuition payments by the taxpayer to a
private occupational school, as defined in section 263 of chapter 112, in which the taxpayer or a
dependent of said taxpayer, pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of part B, is enrolled,
less any scholarships, grants or financial aid received, exceeds twenty-five percent of the
taxpayer’s Massachusetts adjusted gross income, exclusive of this deduction but, the deduction
shall be limited in the manner provided in section 222(d)(3) of the Code as amended and in
of 2

effect for the taxable year. An individual who is a nonresident for all or part of the taxable year
shall not be eligible to claim this deduction.
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of Part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out subparagraph (12) and
inserting in place thereof the following subparagraph:-
(12) An amount equal to the amount of interest payments paid by the taxpayer on
education debt during the taxable year. For the purposes of this subparagraph, the term
"education debt'' shall mean any loan which was or is administered by the financial aid office of
a private occupational school, as defined in section 263 of chapter 112, or a two-year or four-
year college at which the taxpayer, or a dependent of such taxpayer, pursuant to subparagraph (3)
of paragraph (b) of Part B of this section, was enrolled as an undergraduate student and which
loan has been secured through a state student loan program, a federal student loan program or a
commercial lender and which loan was obtained and expended solely for the purposes of paying
tuition and other expenses directly related to such undergraduate student enrollment. A taxpayer
who claims a deduction under this section shall not be eligible for a deduction for the same
expenses under subparagraph (1) of paragraph (d) of section 2 of this chapter.
of 2